Maryland, session 2026, SB0855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0855*

SENATE BILL 855
13–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore County.
13–401.
(a) The following sections of Title 2, Subtitle 2 (“Manufacturer’s Licenses”) of
Division I of this article apply in the county without exception or variation:
(1) § 2–201 (“Issuance by Comptroller”);
(2) § 2–202 (“Class 1 distillery license”);
(3) § 2–203 (“Class 9 limited distillery license”);
(4) § 2–204 (“Class 2 rectifying license”);
(5) § 2–205 (“Class 3 winery license”);
(6) § 2–206 (“Class 4 limited winery license”);
(7) [§ 2–207 (“Class 5 brewery license”);
(8)] § 2–208 (“Class 6 pub–brewery license”);
[(9)] (8) § 2–209 (“Class 7 micro–brewery license”);
[(10)] (9) § 2–210 (“Class 8 farm brewery license”);
[(11)] (10) § 2–211 (“Residency requirement”);
[(12)] (11) § 2–212 (“Additional licenses”);
[(13)] (12) § 2–213 (“Additional fees”);
[(14)] (13) § 2–214 (“Sale or delivery restricted”);
[(15)] (14) § 2–216 (“Interaction between manufacturing entities and
retailers”);
[(16)] (15) § 2–217 (“Distribution of alcoholic beverages — Prohibited
practices”); and
[(17)] (16) § 2–218 (“Restrictive agreements between producers and
retailers — Prohibited”).

SENATE BILL 855 3
(b) Section 2–215 (“Beer sale on credit to retail dealer prohibited”) of Division I of
this article does not apply in the county.
(C) SECTION 2–207 (“CLASS 5 BREWERY LICENSE”) OF DIVISION I OF THIS
ARTICLE APPLIES IN THE COUNTY, SUBJECT TO § 13–403 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
13–403.
(A) THERE IS A MANUFACTURER’S LIMITED BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
PERMIT.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE PERMIT TO A HOLDER OF A
MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE WITH A LOCAL ON–SITE CONSUMPTION PERMIT UNDER
§ 2–207 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERMIT
AUTHORIZES THE HOLDER TO ALLOW A LICENSED CATERER OR OTHER
CONTRACTED PARTY TO PROVIDE SEALED BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR PRODUCTS NOT
MANUFACTURED BY THE PERMIT HOLDER DURING PRIVATE EVENTS FOR
ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION AT THE PREMISES DESCRIBED IN THE
MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE.
(2) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY NOT BE AN AFFILIATE OF THE
LICENSED CATERER OR OTHER CONTRACTED PARTY.
(D) THE PERMIT HOLDER MAY NOT ALLOW PATRONS WHO ARE VISITING ANY
PART OF THE MANUFACTURER’S LICENSED PREMISES THAT IS OPEN TO THE PUBLIC
TO ENTER THE PRIVATE EVENT AREA WHILE THE PRIVATE EVENT IS BEING HELD.
(E) THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL REQUEST APPROVAL FROM THE BOARD
BEFORE EACH EVENT.
(F) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION,
INCLUDING:
(1) CRITERIA FOR APPROVING EVENTS; AND
(2) SETTING THE ANNUAL PERMIT FEE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.